Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-716
Department of Aeronautics; file list of airports with commission.

The Department of Aeronautics shall at all times maintain on file in the office of the commission a list of the airports currently licensed by the department setting forth the legal description of the real property thus used.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 16, p. 1426;

Laws 1980, LB 611, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 127.